Washington statutes.
RCW 35.75.050

Bicycle road fund—Sources—Use.

The city or town council shall by ordinance provide that the whole amount or any amount not less than seventy-five percent of all license fees, penalties or other moneys collected under the authority of this chapter shall be paid into and placed to the credit of a special fund to be known as the "bicycle road fund." The moneys in the bicycle road fund shall not be transferred to any other fund and shall be paid out for the sole purpose of building and maintaining bicycle paths and roadways authorized to be constructed and maintained by this chapter or for special police officers, bicycle tags, stationery and other expenses growing out of the regulating and licensing of the riding of bicycles and other vehicles and the construction, maintenance and regulation of the use of bicycle paths and roadways.

[ 2007 c 218 s 69; 1965 c 7 s 35.75.050. Prior: 1899 c 31 s 6; RRS s 9209.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.